Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-107
National Guard Reserve.

An inactive National Guard may be organized and maintained under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed in accordance with the acts of the Congress of the United States.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 8, p. 659;

C.S.1929, § 55-113;

R.S.1943, § 55-111;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 8, p. 596;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-111;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 5, p. 1583.